Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2207.22
Client, defined.

Client means the person or persons who engage a real property appraiser by employment or contract in a specific assignment whether directly or through an agent.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.06;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 58.